Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0113

Use of the term "cooperative" in name.

Use of the term "cooperative" or its abbreviation under this chapter is not a violation of the provisions restricting the use of the term under RCW 23.86.030.

[ 2019 c 37 s 113.]